Rhode Island statutes. Title 21 Food and Drugs
Chapter 2 Milk Sanitation Code
21-2-53.
Powers of superior court in equity.

In addition to any other remedy set forth in this chapter for the enforcement of the provisions of the chapter or any rule, regulation, order, or decision of the director, the superior court shall have jurisdiction in equity, upon a bill of complaint filed by the director or his or her authorized agents, to restrain or enjoin any person, his or her agents, and servants, from committing any act prohibited by this chapter or prohibited by any lawful rule, regulation, order, or decision of the director. If it is established upon hearing that any person charged, himself or herself or by his or her agents and servants, has been or is committing any act declared to be unlawful by this chapter or is in violation of any rule, regulation, order, and decision of the director, the court shall enter a decree enjoining that person, corporation, or trustee from further commission of that act or actions. In case of violation of an injunction issued under this section, the court or any judge of the court shall summarily try and punish the person, or his or her agents and servants, or both, for contempt of court. The existence of other civil or criminal remedies shall be no defense to this proceeding. The director, or his or her authorized agents, shall not be required in that proceeding to give or post a bond when making an application for an injunction, a restraining order, preliminary injunction, or permanent injunction under this section. The court may issue an ex parte restraining order, until further hearing, upon a reasonable showing ex parte that the respondent has been guilty of a violation, and shall have power to enter preliminary injunctions and grant other relief, pendente lite, which may pertain to equity and justice in the premises. All proceedings under this section, and any appellate proceedings which may follow, shall in all respects follow the course of equity.

History of Section.

P.L. 1962, ch. 80, § 1.

21-2-54.
Prosecution of violations.

The director, or any duly authorized agent, may file a complaint in writing at the suit of the director as complainant in the district court within the district where any violation of the provisions of this chapter or of the lawful regulations of the director adopted pursuant to this chapter are alleged to have been committed. The director or a duly authorized agent shall be exempt from filing any bond or furnishing any surety for costs.

History of Section.

P.L. 1962, ch. 80, § 1.

21-2-55.
Penalties for violations.

Persons convicted of violating any of the provisions of this chapter or the regulations adopted in accordance pursuant to this chapter shall be punished by a term of imprisonment not exceeding three (3) months or by a fine not exceeding one hundred dollars ($100) for the first offense; by a term of imprisonment not exceeding six (6) months or by a fine not exceeding two hundred dollars ($200) for the second offense; and by a term of imprisonment not exceeding one year or by a fine not exceeding five hundred dollars ($500) for a third or subsequent offense.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 132, § 2.

21-2-56.
Taking of samples in investigation of violations.

No person, firm, or corporation, nor the employee of any person, firm, or corporation, shall be liable to prosecution under the provisions of this chapter if the prosecution is based upon samples of milk, unless samples of milk or cream upon which the prosecution is based are taken upon his or her premises or while in his or her possession or under his or her control by an inspector of milk or a collector of samples of milk of some city or town or an employee of the state department of health, and a sealed sample of it is given to him or her.

History of Section.

G.L. 1909, ch. 173, § 15, P.L. 1921, ch. 2070, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 203, § 15; G.L. 1938, ch. 216, § 15; P.L. 1941, ch. 1043, § 1; P.L. 1954, ch. 3311, § 1; G.L. 1956, § 21-5-27; G.L. 1956, §

21-2-56

, P.L. 1962, ch. 80, § 1.

21-2-57.
Severability.

In the event that any provision of this chapter or the application of it to any person or circumstance shall be held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect the provisions or applications of this chapter which can be given effect without the invalid provisions or applications, and to this end the provisions of this chapter are declared to be severable.

History of Section.

P.L. 1962, ch. 80, § 1.